Missouri, session 2026, SB1479.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 536.031, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 536.031,
to read as follows:
536.031. 1. There is established a publication to be
known as the "Code of State Regulations", which shall be
published in a format and medium as prescribed by the
secretary of state from time to time as determined by the
secretary of state.
2. The code of state regulations shall contain the
full text of all rules of state agencies in force and effect
upon the effective date of the first publication thereof,
and effective September 1, 1990, it shall be revised no less
frequently than monthly thereafter so as to include all
rules of state agencies subsequently made, amended or
rescinded. The code may also include citations, references,
or annotations, prepared by the state agency adopting the
rule or by the secretary of state, to any intraagency
ruling, attorney general's opinion, determination,
decisions, order, or other action of the administrative
hearing commission, or any determination, decision, order,
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1479 2
or other action of a court interpreting, applying,
discussing, distinguishing, or otherwise affecting any rule
published in the code.
3. The code of state regulations shall be published in
a format and medium as prescribed by the secretary of state.
4. An agency may incorporate by reference rules,
regulations, standards, and guidelines of an agency of the
United States or a nationally or state-recognized
organization or association without publishing the material
in full. The reference in the agency rules shall fully
identify the incorporated material by publisher, address,
and date in order to specify how a copy of the material may
be obtained, and shall state that the referenced rule,
regulation, standard, or guideline does not include any
later amendments or additions, except that:
(1) Hospital licensure regulations promulgated under
this chapter and chapter 197 may incorporate by reference
Medicare conditions of participation, as defined in section
197.005, and later additions or amendments to such
conditions of participation; [and]
(2) Hospital licensure regulations governing life
safety code standards promulgated under this chapter and
chapter 197 to implement section 197.065 may incorporate, by
reference, later additions or amendments to such rules,
regulations, standards, or guidelines as needed to
consistently apply current standards of safety and practice;
(3) Medicaid regulations promulgated under this
chapter and chapter 208 may incorporate by reference
Medicare fee schedules, as defined in state regulation, and
later additions or amendments to Medicaid reimbursement
methodologies promulgated in title 13 of the code of state
regulations;

SB 1479 3
(4) Medicaid regulations promulgated under this
chapter and chapter 208 may incorporate by reference, later
additions or amendments to federal rules and regulations as
needed to administer the Missouri Medicaid program.
5. The agency adopting a rule, regulation, standard,
or guideline under this section shall maintain a copy of the
referenced rule, regulation, standard, or guideline at the
headquarters of the agency and shall make it available to
the public for inspection and copying at no more than the
actual cost of reproduction. The secretary of state may
omit from the code of state regulations such material
incorporated by reference in any rule the publication of
which would be unduly cumbersome or expensive.
6. The courts of this state shall take judicial
notice, without proof, of the contents of the code of state
regulations.
✓